Utah statutes.
67-19a-204.   Administrator -- Powers.
(1)  In conjunction with any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or other
proceeding, the administrator may:
(a)  administer an oath;
(b)  certify an official act;
(c)  subpoena a witness, document, and other evidence; and
(d)  grant a continuance as provided by rule.
(2) (a)  The administrator may:
(i)  assign qualified, impartial hearing officers on a per case basis to
adjudicate matters under the authority of the office;
(ii)  subpoena witnesses, documents, and other evidence in conjunction with
any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or other proceeding; and
(iii)  upon motion made by a party or person to whom the subpoena is directed
and upon notice to the party who issued the subpoena, quash or modify the
subpoena if it is unreasonable, requires an excessive number of witnesses, or
requests evidence not relevant to any matter in issue.
(b)  In selecting and assigning hearing officers under authority of this
section, the administrator shall appoint hearing officers that have
demonstrated by education, training, and experience the ability to adjudicate
and resolve personnel administration disputes by applying employee relations
principles within a large, public work force.
